Missouri, session 2026, SB1337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 571.023, to read as
follows:
571.023. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Assault weapon", any:
(a) Semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to
accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the
following:
a. A pistol grip or thumbhole stock;
b. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
c. A folding or telescoping stock; or
d. A shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially
or completely encircles the barrel, that allows the bearer
to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being
burned, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel;
(b) Semiautomatic pistol or semiautomatic rifle with a
fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than ten
rounds of ammunition;

SB 1337 2
(c) Semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to
accept a detachable magazine and has:
a. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
b. A folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock;
c. A shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially
or completely encircles the barrel, that allows the bearer
to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being
burned, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; or
d. The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at any
location other than the pistol grip;
(d) Semiautomatic shotgun that has:
a. A pistol grip or thumbhole stock;
b. Any feature capable of functioning as a protruding
grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand;
c. A folding or telescoping stock;
d. A fixed magazine capacity in excess of five rounds;
or
e. An ability to accept a detachable magazine;
(e) Shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or
(f) Conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from
which an assault weapon can be assembled if in the
possession or under the control of a single person.
"Assault weapon" shall not include any firearm made
permanently inoperable;
(2) "Detachable magazine", either:
(a) An ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or
unloaded while detached from a firearm and can be readily
inserted into a firearm; or

SB 1337 3
(b) A magazine that can be detached from a firearm by
pressing a button on the firearm either with a finger, tool,
or bullet;
(3) "Fixed magazine", an ammunition feeding device
contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such
a manner that the device cannot be removed without
disassembly of the firearm action;
(4) "Large capacity magazine", any ammunition feeding
device with the capacity to accept more than ten rounds, but
excluding:
(a) A feeding device that has been permanently altered
so that it cannot accommodate more than ten rounds;
(b) A twenty-two caliber tubular magazine; or
(c) A tubular magazine contained in a lever-action
firearm.
2. No person, corporation, or other entity in the
state of Missouri shall manufacture, import, possess,
purchase, sell, or transfer any assault weapon or large
capacity magazine.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any government officer, agent, or employee; member
of the United States Armed Forces; or peace officer, to the
extent that the person is authorized to acquire or possess
an assault weapon or large capacity magazine and does so
while acting within the scope of his or her duties;
(2) The manufacture of an assault weapon or large
capacity magazine by a firearms manufacturer for the purpose
of sale to an entity or person described under subdivision
(1) of this subsection, provided that the manufacturer is
properly licensed under federal and state laws;
(3) The sale or transfer of an assault weapon or large
capacity ammunition feeding device by a dealer, who is

SB 1337 4
properly licensed under federal, state, and local laws, to
an entity or person described under subdivision (1) of this
subsection for use by that entity or person for official
purposes; or
(4) Any person who, prior to and continuously since
the effective date of this section, was legally in
possession of an assault weapon or large capacity magazine.
4. A violation of this section is a class C felony.
✓